test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
      koskel+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kosklaist
      koskel+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kosklaistki
      koskel+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kosklais
      koskel+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kosklaiski
      koskel+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kosklaisse
      koskel+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kosklaissegi
      koskel+N+Pl+Com: kosklatega
      koskel+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kosklategagi
      koskel+N+Pl+Abe: kosklateta
      koskel+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kosklatetagi
      koskel+N+Pl+Ess: kosklatena
      koskel+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kosklatenagi
      koskel+N+Pl+Trm: kosklateni
      koskel+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kosklatenigi
      koskel+N+Pl+Tra: kosklateks
      koskel+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kosklatekski
      koskel+N+Pl+Abl: kosklatelt
      koskel+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kosklateltki
      koskel+N+Pl+Ade: kosklatel
      koskel+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kosklatelgi
      koskel+N+Pl+All: kosklatele
      koskel+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kosklatelegi
      koskel+N+Pl+Ela: kosklatest
      koskel+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kosklatestki
      koskel+N+Pl+Ine: kosklates
      koskel+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kosklateski
      koskel+N+Pl+Ill: kosklatesse
      koskel+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kosklatessegi
      koskel+N+Pl+Gen: kosklate
      koskel+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kosklategi
      koskel+N+Sg+Nom: koskel
      koskel+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: koskelgi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Com: kotkaga
      kotkas+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kotkagagi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Abe: kotkata
      kotkas+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kotkatagi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ess: kotkana
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kotkanagi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Trm: kotkani
      kotkas+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kotkanigi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Tra: kotkaks
      kotkas+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kotkakski
      kotkas+N+Sg+Abl: kotkalt
      kotkas+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kotkaltki
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ade: kotkal
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kotkalgi
      kotkas+N+Sg+All: kotkale
      kotkas+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kotkalegi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ela: kotkast
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kotkastki
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ine: kotkas
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kotkaski
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ill: kotkasse
      kotkas+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kotkassegi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Gen: kotka
      kotkas+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kotkagi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Nom: kotkad
      kotkas+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kotkadki
      kotkas+N+Pl+Par: kotkaid
      kotkas+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kotkaidki
      kotkas+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kotkaiks
      kotkas+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kotkaikski
      kotkas+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kotkailt
      kotkas+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kotkailtki
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kotkail
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kotkailgi
      kotkas+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kotkaile
      kotkas+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kotkailegi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kotkaist
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kotkaistki
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kotkais
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kotkaiski
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kotkaisse
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kotkaissegi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Com: kotkastega
      kotkas+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kotkastegagi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Abe: kotkasteta
      kotkas+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kotkastetagi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ess: kotkastena
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kotkastenagi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Trm: kotkasteni
      kotkas+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kotkastenigi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Tra: kotkasteks
      kotkas+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kotkastekski
      kotkas+N+Pl+Abl: kotkastelt
      kotkas+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kotkasteltki
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ade: kotkastel
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kotkastelgi
      kotkas+N+Pl+All: kotkastele
      kotkas+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kotkastelegi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ela: kotkastest
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kotkastestki
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ine: kotkastes
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kotkasteski
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ill: kotkastesse
      kotkas+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kotkastessegi
      kotkas+N+Pl+Gen: kotkaste
      kotkas+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kotkastegi
      kotkas+N+Sg+Nom: kotkas
      kotkas+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kotkaski
      kotkas+N+Sg+Par: kotkast
      kotkas+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kotkastki
      kuld+N+Sg+Nom: kuld
      kuld+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kuldki
      kuld+N+Sg+Ill: kulda
      kuld+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kuldagi
      kuld+N+Sg+Par: kulda
      kuld+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kuldagi
      kuld+N+Pl+Par: kuldasid
      kuld+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kuldasidki
      kuld+N+Pl+Com: kuldadega
      kuld+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kuldadegagi
      kuld+N+Pl+Abe: kuldadeta
      kuld+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kuldadetagi
      kuld+N+Pl+Ess: kuldadena
      kuld+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kuldadenagi
      kuld+N+Pl+Trm: kuldadeni
      kuld+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kuldadenigi
      kuld+N+Pl+Tra: kuldadeks
      kuld+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kuldadekski
      kuld+N+Pl+Abl: kuldadelt
      kuld+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kuldadeltki
      kuld+N+Pl+Ade: kuldadel
      kuld+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kuldadelgi
      kuld+N+Pl+All: kuldadele
      kuld+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kuldadelegi
      kuld+N+Pl+Ela: kuldadest
      kuld+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kuldadestki
      kuld+N+Pl+Ine: kuldades
      kuld+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kuldadeski
      kuld+N+Pl+Ill: kuldadesse
      kuld+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kuldadessegi
      kuld+N+Pl+Gen: kuldade
      kuld+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kuldadegi
      kuld+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuldigi
      kuld+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kuldi
      kuld+N+Sg+Com: kullaga
      kuld+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kullagagi
      kuld+N+Sg+Abe: kullata
      kuld+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kullatagi
      kuld+N+Sg+Ess: kullana
      kuld+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kullanagi
      kuld+N+Sg+Trm: kullani
      kuld+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kullanigi
      kuld+N+Sg+Tra: kullaks
      kuld+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kullakski
      kuld+N+Sg+Abl: kullalt
      kuld+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kullaltki
      kuld+N+Sg+Ade: kullal
      kuld+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kullalgi
      kuld+N+Sg+All: kullale
      kuld+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kullalegi
      kuld+N+Sg+Ela: kullast
      kuld+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kullastki
      kuld+N+Sg+Ine: kullas
      kuld+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kullaski
      kuld+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: kullassegi
      kuld+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kullasse
      kuld+N+Sg+Gen: kulla
      kuld+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kullagi
      kuld+N+Pl+Nom: kullad
      kuld+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kulladki
      kurat+N+Pl+Par: kuradeid
      kurat+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kuradeidki
      kurat+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kuradeiks
      kurat+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuradeikski
      kurat+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kuradeilt
      kurat+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuradeiltki
      kurat+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kuradeil
      kurat+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuradeilgi
      kurat+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kuradeile
      kurat+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuradeilegi
      kurat+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kuradeist
      kurat+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuradeistki
      kurat+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kuradeis
      kurat+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuradeiski
      kurat+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kuradeisse
      kurat+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: kuradeissegi
      kurat+N+Sg+Com: kuradiga
      kurat+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kuradigagi
      kurat+N+Sg+Abe: kuradita
      kurat+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kuraditagi
      kurat+N+Sg+Ess: kuradina
      kurat+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kuradinagi
      kurat+N+Sg+Trm: kuradini
      kurat+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kuradinigi
      kurat+N+Sg+Tra: kuradiks
      kurat+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kuradikski
      kurat+N+Sg+Abl: kuradilt
      kurat+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kuradiltki
      kurat+N+Sg+Ade: kuradil
      kurat+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kuradilgi
      kurat+N+Sg+All: kuradile
      kurat+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kuradilegi
      kurat+N+Sg+Ela: kuradist
      kurat+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kuradistki
      kurat+N+Sg+Ine: kuradis
      kurat+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kuradiski
      kurat+N+Sg+Ill: kuradisse
      kurat+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kuradissegi
      kurat+N+Sg+Gen: kuradi
      kurat+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kuradigi
      kurat+N+Sg+Par: kuradit
      kurat+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kuraditki
      kurat+N+Pl+Nom: kuradid
      kurat+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kuradidki
      kurat+N+Pl+Com: kuraditega
      kurat+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kuraditegagi
      kurat+N+Pl+Abe: kuraditeta
      kurat+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kuraditetagi
      kurat+N+Pl+Ess: kuraditena
      kurat+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kuraditenagi
      kurat+N+Pl+Trm: kuraditeni
      kurat+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kuraditenigi
      kurat+N+Pl+Tra: kuraditeks
      kurat+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kuraditekski
      kurat+N+Pl+Abl: kuraditelt
      kurat+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kuraditeltki
      kurat+N+Pl+Ade: kuraditel
      kurat+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kuraditelgi
      kurat+N+Pl+All: kuraditele
      kurat+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kuraditelegi
      kurat+N+Pl+Ela: kuraditest
      kurat+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kuraditestki
      kurat+N+Pl+Ine: kuradites
      kurat+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kuraditeski
      kurat+N+Pl+Ill: kuraditesse
      kurat+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kuraditessegi
      kurat+N+Pl+Gen: kuradite
      kurat+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kuraditegi
      kurat+N+Sg+Nom: kurat
      kurat+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kuratki
      käive+N+Sg+Com: käibega
      käive+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: käibegagi
      käive+N+Sg+Abe: käibeta
      käive+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: käibetagi
      käive+N+Sg+Ess: käibena
      käive+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: käibenagi
      käive+N+Sg+Trm: käibeni
      käive+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: käibenigi
      käive+N+Sg+Tra: käibeks
      käive+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: käibekski
      käive+N+Sg+Abl: käibelt
      käive+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: käibeltki
      käive+N+Sg+Ade: käibel
      käive+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: käibelgi
      käive+N+Sg+All: käibele
      käive+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: käibelegi
      käive+N+Sg+Ela: käibest
      käive+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: käibestki
      käive+N+Sg+Ine: käibes
      käive+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: käibeski
      käive+N+Sg+Ill: käibesse
      käive+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: käibessegi
      käive+N+Sg+Gen: käibe
      käive+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: käibegi
      käive+N+Pl+Nom: käibed
      käive+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: käibedki
      käive+N+Pl+Par: käibeid
      käive+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: käibeidki
      käive+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: käibeiks
      käive+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: käibeikski
      käive+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: käibeilt
      käive+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: käibeiltki
      käive+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: käibeil
      käive+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: käibeilgi
      käive+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: käibeile
      käive+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: käibeilegi
      käive+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: käibeist
      käive+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: käibeistki
      käive+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: käibeis
      käive+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: käibeiski
      käive+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: käibeisse
      käive+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: käibeissegi
      käive+N+Sg+Nom: käive
      käive+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: käivegi
      käive+N+Sg+Par: käivet
      käive+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: käivetki
      käive+N+Pl+Com: käivetega
      käive+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: käivetegagi
      käive+N+Pl+Abe: käiveteta
      käive+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: käivetetagi
      käive+N+Pl+Ess: käivetena
      käive+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: käivetenagi
      käive+N+Pl+Trm: käiveteni
      käive+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: käivetenigi
      käive+N+Pl+Tra: käiveteks
      käive+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: käivetekski
      käive+N+Pl+Abl: käivetelt
      käive+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: käiveteltki
      käive+N+Pl+Ade: käivetel
      käive+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: käivetelgi
      käive+N+Pl+All: käivetele
      käive+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: käivetelegi
      käive+N+Pl+Ela: käivetest
      käive+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: käivetestki
      käive+N+Pl+Ine: käivetes
      käive+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: käiveteski
      käive+N+Pl+Ill: käivetesse
      käive+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: käivetessegi
      käive+N+Pl+Gen: käivete
      käive+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: käivetegi
      kärg+N+Sg+Nom: kärg
      kärg+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kärgki
      kärg+N+Sg+Ill: kärge
      kärg+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kärgegi
      kärg+N+Sg+Par: kärge
      kärg+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kärgegi
      kärg+N+Pl+Par: kärgesid
      kärg+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kärgesidki
      kärg+N+Pl+Com: kärgedega
      kärg+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kärgedegagi
      kärg+N+Pl+Abe: kärgedeta
      kärg+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kärgedetagi
      kärg+N+Pl+Ess: kärgedena
      kärg+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kärgedenagi
      kärg+N+Pl+Trm: kärgedeni
      kärg+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kärgedenigi
      kärg+N+Pl+Tra: kärgedeks
      kärg+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kärgedekski
      kärg+N+Pl+Abl: kärgedelt
      kärg+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kärgedeltki
      kärg+N+Pl+Ade: kärgedel
      kärg+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kärgedelgi
